Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2652
Final judgments; failure to satisfy; effect.

(1) A pesticide dealer or a commercial, noncommercial, or private applicator or an applicant for any such license shall not allow a final judgment against the applicant or licensee for damages arising from a violation of a provision of the Pesticide Act to remain unsatisfied for a period of more than thirty days.

(2) Failure to satisfy within thirty days a final judgment resulting from any activity regulated under the act shall result in automatic suspension or denial of the applicable license.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 31.